Kentucky statutes. TITLE IV Judicial Branch
CHAPTER 32 Financing of Unified State Court System

32.010.
Intent — Construction of law. [Repealed.]

32.011.
Construction of law.

Nothing contained in KRS

32.011

to

32.070

shall be construed as limiting, restricting, or terminating the authority of local governmental units, including cities, counties, and urban-county governments, to provide financial support for the court system and the offices of the Commonwealth’s attorneys which are serving that local community, and all such units of local government are further authorized to supplement the financial support provided thereto by the state under KRS

32.011

to

32.070

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 201, § 1, effective July 1, 1976.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Although the General Assembly has made no express provision for the appointment of an assistant Commonwealth’s attorney in the 36th judicial district, the two fiscal courts in that district could enact an ordinance permitting the Commonwealth’s attorney to appoint an assistant and providing a salary for the assistant.

OAG 76-524

.

KRS

15.750

, KRS

67.083

and this section when read together authorize a fiscal court to contribute county money to the payment of the salary of an assistant Commonwealth’s attorney.

OAG 79-190

.

32.020.
Expense allowances for judges of Court of Appeals and circuit courts. [Repealed.]

32.021.
Facilities and services for circuit court. [Expired.]

32.030.
Court reporters and secretaries. [Repealed.]

32.031.
Secretaries for Circuit Judges.

Each Circuit Judge may employ a secretary. The secretary shall be appointed by and shall hold office at the pleasure of the judge. The salary for the secretary, payable out of the State Treasury, shall be commensurate with the secretary’s education, training, and experience based upon the guidelines established by the classification and compensation plan for comparable positions maintained by the state Personnel Cabinet pursuant to KRS

64.640

. Persons employed as secretaries to Circuit Judges shall be members of the Kentucky Employees Retirement System in accordance with the provisions of KRS

61.510

to

61.692

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 201, § 3, effective July 1, 1976; 1980, ch. 188, § 13, effective July 15, 1980; 1998, ch. 154, § 58, effective July 15, 1998.

32.040.
Appointment of full-time assistant commonwealth attorneys, secretaries and district detectives. [Repealed.]

32.041.
Facilities and services for commonwealth’s attorneys. [Expired.]

32.050.
Retirement system coverage. [Repealed.]

32.060.
Effective date of appointments, employment of persons, and expense allowances. [Repealed.]

32.070.
Expense allowances for grand jurors, petit jurors, and persons summoned for jury service.

Beginning July 1, 1976, or at such earlier date as may be fixed as hereinafter provided, grand jurors, petit jurors and persons summoned for jury service in Circuit Court eligible for payment of the compensation designated in KRS 29A.170(1) shall be paid, in addition thereto, the sum of seven dollars and fifty cents ($7.50) per day as reimbursement of expenses incurred, which sum is hereby determined to be the equivalent of the minimum daily expenses reasonably to be incurred by such juror or person. Payment of such reimbursement for expenses may be made beginning as of such date prior to July 1, 1976, but not prior to July 1, 1974, as may be fixed by the Governor upon recommendation of the secretary of justice and public safety if and to the extent that prior to July 1, 1976, the Commonwealth of Kentucky is awarded grant funds by the Law Enforcement Assistance Administration of the United States Department of Justice on a matching basis of not less than ninety percent (90%) federal funds and ten percent (10%) state funds which grant funds are sufficient to pay the full cost of the reimbursement of expenses, and of the administrative expenses related thereto, authorized by this section from the date so fixed through June 30, 1976. Eligible state funds appropriated for the 1974-1976 biennium may be used for matching purposes so long as such use does not reduce the level of services provided in the executive budget for that biennium.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 369, § 7; 2007, ch. 85, § 117, effective June 26, 2007.

Opinions of Attorney General.

The jurors’ per diem expense allowance and the daily compensation should be administered in a single fund.

OAG 76-222

.